Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 8 Depository Change in Control Act

19-8-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter the terms:

“Control” shall have the meaning set forth in the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12 U.S.C. § 1841 et seq.

“Regulated institution” shall also include a Rhode Island bank-holding company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46.

19-8-2.
Application to director or the director’s designee.

Any person who, acting directly or indirectly or through or in concert with one or more other persons, acquires control of any financial institution through purchase, assignment, transfer, pledge or other disposition of voting stock of a financial institution shall make application to the director, or the director’s designee, in the prescribed manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46.

19-8-3.
Review of application.

Upon receiving an application, the director, or the director’s designee, shall:

Conduct an investigation of the competence, experience, integrity, and financial ability of each person by whom the acquisition is to be made; and

Make an independent determination of the accuracy and completeness of any information prescribed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46.

19-8-4.
Contents of application.

Except as otherwise provided, an application filed pursuant to this section shall contain the following information:

The identity, personal history, business background, and experience of each person by whom or on whose behalf the acquisition is to be made, including the person’s material business activities and affiliations during the past five (5) years, a description of any material pending legal or administrative proceedings in which he or she is a party, and any pending or prior criminal indictment or conviction of the person by a state or federal court;

A statement of the assets and liabilities of each person by whom, or on whose behalf, the acquisition is to be made, as of the end of the fiscal year for each of the five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the application, together with related statements of income and source and application of funds for each of the fiscal years then concluded, all prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, and an interim statement of the assets and liabilities for each such person, together with related statements of income and source and application of funds, as of a date not more than ninety (90) days prior to the date of the filing of the application;

The terms and conditions of the proposed acquisition and the manner in which the acquisition is to be made;

The identity, source, and amount of the funds or other consideration used, or to be used, in making the acquisition, and if any part of these funds or other consideration has been, or is to be, borrowed or otherwise obtained for the purpose of making the acquisition, a description detailing the transaction, the names of the parties, and any arrangements, agreements, or understandings with these persons;

Any plans or proposals that any acquiring party making the acquisition may have to liquidate the regulated institution, to sell its assets or merge it with any company, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management;

The identification of any person employed, retained, or to be compensated by the acquiring party, or by any person on his or her behalf, to make solicitations or recommendations to stockholders for the purpose of assisting in the acquisition, and a description of the terms of the employment, retainer, or arrangement for compensation;

Copies of all invitations or tenders or advertisements making a tender offer to stockholders for purchase of their stock to be used in connection with the proposed acquisition;

Any additional information in the form that the director, or the director’s designee, may require;

Evidence that a majority of the shares of stock entitled to vote of the financial institution whose shares of voting stock are to be acquired have approved the change of control at a meeting called for that purpose or in writing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46; P.L. 2001, ch. 128, § 4.

19-8-5.
Issuance or denial of application.

The director, or the director’s designee, may disapprove any proposed acquisition if:

The proposed acquisition of control would result in a monopoly or would be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or attempt to monopolize the business of banking;

The effect of the proposed acquisition of control may be substantially to lessen competition, or to tend to create a monopoly, or would in any other manner be in restraint of trade, and the anticompetitive effects of the proposed acquisition of control are not outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the transaction in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served;

The financial condition of any acquiring person might jeopardize the financial stability of the regulated institution or prejudice the interests of the depositors of the regulated institution;

The competence, experience, or integrity of any acquiring person, or of any of the proposed management personnel, indicates that it would not be in the interest of the depositors of the regulated institution, or in the interest of the public to permit the person to control the regulated institution;

Any acquiring person neglects, fails, or refuses to furnish the information required; or

The acquisition would not promote the public convenience and advantage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46.

19-8-6.
Notice of change in control.

Whenever a change in control occurs, each regulated institution shall report promptly to the appropriate banking regulator any change or replacement of its chief executive officer or any directors occurring in the next twelve-month (12) period. The report shall contain a statement of the past and current business and professional affiliations of the new chief executive officer or directors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 7.

19-8-7.
Waiver of application and hearing process in the public interest.

The application process and public hearing requirement may be waived by the director, or the director’s designee, in writing, when, in the public interest, the change in control results from any regulatory action in order to prevent a probable failure or default of the regulated institution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46.

19-8-8.
Rules and regulations.

The director, or the director’s designee, may adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46.

19-8-9.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 46.